Louisiana, session 2026, HB565.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1563(C)(1) and (4) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1563. Powers and duties generally; use of deputies; responsibilities of local
governing authorities with fire prevention bureaus; open structures and
process structures; fees
* * *
C.(1) The fire marshal shall not conduct or supervise inspections pursuant
to the provisions of Paragraphs (B)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this Section within the
jurisdiction of any local governing authority in which a fire prevention bureau has
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 565 ENROLLED
been properly established by special ordinance and accompanying resolution as
provided in this Section, except as provided in Paragraph Paragraphs (4) and (5) of
this Subsection.
* * *
(4)(a) The fire marshal shall remain responsible for all institutional
occupancies requiring a state or federal license, detention, colleges, universities,
state-owned and state-leased buildings, and schools, including early learning centers
and child day care centers as defined in R.S. 17:407.33, where applicable, and the
applicable federal and state life safety codes shall be the codes applying to these
facilities. Nothing contained herein shall limit the right of the local fire department
to consult with the fire marshal or otherwise restrict the authority of the local fire
department to conduct fire preplanning for any occupancy within its jurisdiction.
(b) The state fire marshal shall enforce only those fire safety requirements
expressly provided for in adopted state or federal fire and life safety codes and shall
not impose additional requirements through policy, guidance, or interpretation.
(c) Any fire safety requirement imposed on an early learning center or child
day care center shall be proportional to the size, occupancy, and risk level of that
facility, and shall not be applied in a manner consistent with a commercial or
industrial occupancy unless expressly required by the applicable code.
(d) The use of standard residential appliances, including but not limited to
microwaves, coffee makers, and similar devices, shall not require commercial
ventilation or fire suppression systems unless expressly required by applicable code.
(e) The state fire marshal shall provide written notice of a determination of
any violation or of required corrective action, including citation to the specific
applicable code provision.
(f)(i) Any person aggrieved by a determination of the state fire marshal
regarding fire safety requirements for an early learning center or child day care
center may appeal that determination to the division of administrative law within
fifteen days of receipt of written notice.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 565 ENROLLED
(ii) All enforcement actions, including fines, penalties, or closure, shall be
stayed pending final disposition of the appeal.
(iii) The state fire marshal bears the burden of proving that the requirement
is expressly authorized by adopted state or federal fire and life safety codes.
* * *

SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.